Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART A IN GENERAL
19-2.5-1108. Probation - terms - release - revocation - graduated responses system - rules - report - definition.

The terms and conditions of probation must be specified by rules or orders of the court. The court, as a condition of probation for a juvenile who is ten years of age or older but less than eighteen years of age on the date of the sentencing hearing,
may impose a commitment or detention. The aggregate length of any such commitment or detention, whether continuous or at designated intervals, must not exceed forty-five days; except that such limit does not apply to
any placement out of the home through a county department of human or social services. Each juvenile placed on probation must be given a written statement of the terms and conditions of the juvenile's probation and
have the terms and conditions fully explained.

The court, as a condition of probation for a youth eighteen years of age or older at the time of sentencing for delinquent acts committed prior to the youth's eighteenth birthday, may impose as a condition of probation a sentence to the county jail that
must not exceed ninety days; except that the sentence may be for a period of up to one hundred eighty days if the court orders the youth released for school attendance, job training, or employment.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (2)(a) is effective until December 31, 2022.] Conditions of probation must be customized to each juvenile based on the guidelines developed by the committee on juvenile justice reform
pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402. The court shall, as minimum conditions of probation, order that the juvenile:

(2)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (2)(a) is effective December 31, 2022.] Conditions of probation must be customized to each juvenile based on the guidelines developed by the committee on juvenile justice reform
pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402, as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022. The court shall, as minimum conditions of probation, order that the juvenile:

Not violate any federal or state statutes, municipal ordinances, or orders of the court;

Not use or possess a firearm, a dangerous or illegal weapon, or an explosive or incendiary device, unless granted written permission by the court or probation officer;

Report to a probation officer at reasonable times as directed by the court or probation officer;

Permit the probation officer to visit the juvenile at reasonable times at the juvenile's home or elsewhere;

Remain within the jurisdiction of the court, unless granted permission to leave by the court or the probation officer;

Answer all reasonable inquiries by the probation officer and promptly notify the probation officer of any change in address or employment;

Make restitution as ordered by the court; and

and (IX) Repealed.

(X) May be evaluated to determine whether the juvenile would be suitable for restorative justice practices that would be a part of the juvenile's probation program; except that the court may not order participation in restorative justice practices if
the juvenile was adjudicated a delinquent for unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); a crime in which the underlying factual basis involves domestic violence, as defined in section
18-6-800.3 (1); stalking, as defined in section 18-3-602; or violation of a protection order, as defined in section 18-6-803.5.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective until December 31, 2022.] The court shall use the results from a validated risk and needs assessment adopted by the juvenile justice reform committee pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 to inform
the court of additional conditions of probation, as necessary.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
The court shall use the results from a validated risk and needs assessment adopted by the committee on juvenile justice reform pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402, as it existed prior to its repeal
in 2022, to inform the court of additional conditions of probation, as necessary.

The court may periodically review the terms and conditions of probation and the progress of each juvenile placed on probation. Counsel for the juvenile does not have to be present at any probation review hearing unless notified by the court that a petition
to revoke probation has been filed.

The court may release a juvenile from probation prior to the completion of the juvenile's term of probation, pursuant to this section, or modify the terms and conditions of the juvenile's probation at any time, but a juvenile who has complied satisfactorily
with the terms and conditions of the juvenile's probation for a period of two years must be released from probation and the jurisdiction of the court terminated.

Before January 1, 2021, the state court administrator shall establish rules to develop a statewide system of structured community-based graduated responses, including incentives and sanctions, to guide probation officers in determining how best to motivate
positive juvenile behavior change and the appropriate response to a violation of terms and conditions of juvenile probation. "Graduated responses" means an accountability-based series of sanctions and services designed to respond
to a juvenile's violation of probation quickly, consistently, and proportionally and incentives to motivate positive behavior change and successful completion of probation and treatment goals. Juvenile probation shall adopt
and use a state juvenile graduated responses and incentives system developed pursuant to this subsection (4) or develop and use a locally developed system that is aligned to best practices. Policies and procedures for the graduated
responses system must:

Include incentives that encourage the completion of treatment milestones as well as compliance with the terms and conditions of a juvenile's probation and that reward behavior aligned with the expectations of supervision and the juvenile's case plan;
and

Require that a response to a juvenile's violation of the terms and conditions of the juvenile's supervision take into consideration:

The juvenile's risk to reoffend, as determined by the results of a validated risk and needs assessment;

The previous history of violations and the underlying cause of the juvenile's behavior leading to the violation;

The severity of the current violation;

The juvenile's case plan; and

The juvenile's previous responses to past violations.

Whenever a probation office has reasonable cause to believe that a juvenile has committed a violation of the terms and conditions of probation and that graduated responses developed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section have previously been applied,
or when the nature of the violation poses a substantial risk of serious harm to others, the probation officer, following the approval of the chief probation officer or the chief's designee, shall petition the court for revocation
and shall file written information with the court concerning the juvenile's violation behavior history and the responses applied using the graduated response system developed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Unless there is reason to believe that a juvenile would not appear, would interfere with the juvenile justice process, or poses substantial risk of serious harm to others, the probation officer shall issue a summons, or other method approved by local
court rule, rather than a warrant when filing a petition for revocation.

The state court administrator shall collect data related to the use of the graduated responses and incentives system developed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and report the data annually to the judiciary committees of the senate and house
of representatives, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and the chief justice of the Colorado
supreme court. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reports to the committees continue indefinitely. Data collected by the state court administrator must include, at a minimum, the types of responses and incentives
that were issued, the number of formal violations filed, and the behavior resulting in the violation.

When it is alleged that a juvenile has violated the terms and conditions of probation, and graduated responses have been imposed and exhausted, pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the court shall set a hearing on the alleged violation and shall
give notice to the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian and any other parties to the proceeding as provided in section 19-2.5-501.

The juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian must be given a written statement concerning the alleged violation, and have the right to be represented by counsel at the hearing, and are entitled to the issuance of compulsory
process for the attendance of witnesses.

When the juvenile has been taken into custody because of the alleged violation, sections 19-2.5-303, 19-2.5-304, and 19-2.5-305 apply.

The hearing on the alleged violation must be conducted pursuant to section 19-1-106.

Pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103, if the court finds that the juvenile violated the terms and conditions of probation, it may modify the terms and conditions of probation, revoke probation, or take such other action permitted by this article 2.5 that is
in the best interest of the juvenile and the public.

If the court finds that the juvenile did not violate the terms and conditions of probation as alleged, it shall dismiss the proceedings and continue the juvenile on probation under the terms and conditions previously prescribed.

If the court revokes the probation of a person eighteen years of age or older, in addition to other action permitted by this article 2.5, the court may sentence the person to the county jail for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty days, during which
time the person may be released during the day for school attendance, job training, or employment, as ordered by the court; except that, if the sentence imposed exceeds ninety days, the court shall order the person
released for school attendance, job training, or employment while serving the sentence.

Following specification of the terms and conditions of probation, where the conditions of probation include requiring the juvenile to attend school, the court shall notify the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled of the requirement.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 641, § 2, effective October 1; (2)(a)(VII) amended and (2)(a)(VIII) and (2)(a)(IX) repealed, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3119, § 30, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
IP(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 22-1211), ch. 79, p. 394, § 7, effective December 31.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-925 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

19-2.5-1109. Juvenile probation standards - development.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective until December 31, 2022.] Before July 1, 2021, the state court administrator, in consultation with judges, the judicial branch, district attorneys, defense counsel,
the delivery of child welfare services task force created in section 26-5-105.8, and other interested parties shall establish statewide standards for juvenile probation supervision and services that are aligned with research-based
practices and based on the juvenile's risk of reoffending, as determined by a validated risk and needs assessment tool adopted pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402. The state court administrator shall at least annually provide
training to juvenile probation on the adoption and implementation of these standards. Juvenile standards must include, but need not be limited to:

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
Before July 1, 2021, the state court administrator, in consultation with judges, the judicial branch, district attorneys, defense counsel, the delivery of child welfare services task force created in section
26-5-105.8, and other interested parties shall establish statewide standards for juvenile probation supervision and services that are aligned with research-based practices and based on the juvenile's risk of reoffending,
as determined by a validated risk and needs assessment tool adopted pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402, as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022. The state court administrator shall at least annually provide training to
juvenile probation on the adoption and implementation of these standards. Juvenile standards must include, but need not be limited to:

Guidelines to support juvenile probation in adopting the most effective staffing and workloads in order to allocate probation resources most appropriately;

Standards for minimum case contacts, including contacts with juveniles as well as their family members;

Common elements for written individualized case plans for each juvenile placed under the supervision of a probation officer. In developing such a case plan, juvenile probation shall use, but need not be limited to:

The results of a validated risk and needs assessment;

The results of a validated mental health screening, and full assessment if conducted;

The trauma, if any, experienced by the juvenile;

The juvenile's education level and any intellectual and developmental disability;

The seriousness of the offense committed by the juvenile; and

Any relevant information provided by the juvenile's family, including the juvenile's pro-social interests.

A case plan developed pursuant to this section must:

Address the risks the juvenile presents and the juvenile's service needs based on the results of the validated risk and needs assessment, including specific treatment goals;

Specify the level of supervision and intensity of services that the juvenile must receive;

Provide referrals to treatment providers that may address the juvenile's risks and needs;

Be developed in consultation with the juvenile and the juvenile's family or guardian;

Specify the responsibilities of each person or agency involved with the juvenile; and

Provide for the full reentry of the juvenile into the community.

Criteria and policies for the early termination of the juvenile's supervised probation.

Juvenile probation and the juvenile court shall consider the following factors, among others, in determining the early termination of supervision:

The seriousness of the offense committed by the juvenile resulting in placement under the supervision of a probation officer;

The results of a validated risk and needs assessment, which must be conducted at least every six months to determine whether the juvenile's risk of reoffending or risk scores in key domains have been reduced;

The juvenile's progress in meeting the goals of the juvenile's individualized case plan; and

The juvenile's offense history, if any, during the juvenile's probation term.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(e) is effective until December 31, 2022.] Common criteria for when juvenile probation officers may recommend the use of out-of-home placements and commitment to the division of youth services. The court shall
consider the results of a validated risk and needs assessment, a validated mental health screening, and, if applicable, a full mental health assessment conducted pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 to make decisions concerning
the juvenile's placement.

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(e) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
Common criteria for when juvenile probation officers may recommend the use of out-of-home placements and commitment to the division of youth services. The court shall consider the results of a validated
risk and needs assessment, a validated mental health screening, and, if applicable, a full mental health assessment to make decisions concerning the juvenile's placement.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 644, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
IP(1) and (1)(e) amended, (HB 22-1211), ch. 79, p. 394, § 8, effective December 31.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-925.2 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1110. Sentencing - requirements imposed on parents - definition.

In addition to any requirements specified in sections 19-2.5-1103 to 19-2.5-1106, 19-2.5-1111 to 19-2.5-1115, 19-2.5-1117, 19-2.5-1118, 19-2.5-1123, and 19-2.5-1126, any sentence imposed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103 may require:

The juvenile or both the juvenile and the juvenile's parent or guardian to perform volunteer service in the community designed to contribute to the juvenile's rehabilitation or to the ability of the parent or guardian to provide proper parental care and
supervision of the juvenile;

The juvenile's parent or guardian or both the parent or guardian and the juvenile to attend the parental responsibility training program described in section 19-2.5-1411. The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof of completion of the training
course within a certain time period and may provide that any violation of such orders subjects the parent or guardian to the contempt sanctions of the court.

The juvenile or both the juvenile and the juvenile's custodial parent or parent with parental responsibilities or guardian to perform services for the victim pursuant to section 19-2.5-1106, designed to contribute to the juvenile's rehabilitation, if
the victim consents in writing to such services. However, the value of the services required to be rendered by the parent, guardian, legal custodian of, or parent with parental responsibilities with respect to the juvenile
pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) must not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for any one delinquent act.

In addition to any sentence imposed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103 or subsection (1) of this section and regardless of whether the court orders the juvenile to pay restitution pursuant to section 19-2.5-1104, the court may order:

The juvenile's guardian or legal custodian or the parent allocated parental responsibilities with respect to the juvenile to make restitution to one or more victims pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in this subsection (2); except that the
liability of the juvenile's guardian or legal custodian or parent allocated parental responsibilities with respect to the juvenile pursuant to this subsection (2) must not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for any
one delinquent act. If the court finds, after a hearing, that the juvenile's guardian or legal custodian or the parent allocated parental responsibilities with respect to the juvenile has made diligent, good-faith efforts
to prevent or discourage the juvenile from engaging in delinquent activity, the court shall absolve the guardian or legal custodian or parent allocated parental responsibilities with respect to the juvenile of liability
for restitution pursuant to this subsection (2).

The juvenile's parent, so long as the parent is a party to the delinquency proceedings, to make restitution to one or more victims pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in this subsection (2)(b); except that the liability of the juvenile's parent
pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) must not exceed the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars for any one delinquent act. Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection (2), the court may not enter an order of
restitution against a juvenile's parent unless the court, prior to entering the order of restitution, holds a restitution hearing at which the juvenile's parent is present. If the court finds, after the hearing, that
the juvenile's parent has made diligent, good-faith efforts to prevent or discourage the juvenile from engaging in delinquent activity, the court shall absolve the parent of liability for restitution pursuant to this
subsection (2)(b). For purposes of this subsection (2)(b), "parent" is defined in section 19-1-103.

An order of restitution entered pursuant to this section may be collected pursuant to article 18.5 of title 16.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 646, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-919 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1111. Sentencing - community accountability program.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127, the court may sentence the juvenile to participate in the community accountability program as set forth in section 19-2.5-1410. Such a sentence is a condition of probation for higher-risk juveniles
who would have otherwise been sentenced to detention or out-of-home placement or committed to the department of human services. A sentence pursuant to this section is conditioned on the availability of space in the community accountability
program and on a determination by the division of youth services that the juvenile's participation in the program is appropriate. In the event that the division of youth services determines the program is at maximum capacity or
that a juvenile's participation is not appropriate, the juvenile must be ordered to return to the sentencing court for another sentencing hearing.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 647, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-914 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1112. Sentencing - placement with relative.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court may place the juvenile in the legal custody of a relative or other suitable person under such conditions as the court may impose, which may include placing
the juvenile on probation pursuant to section 19-2.5-1106 or under protective supervision.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 647, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-912 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1113. Sentencing - alternative services - detention.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender and except as required by section 19-2.5-1123, the court may sentence the juvenile to alternative services funded through section 19-2.5-1404 or other alternative
services programs. If a juvenile who is thirteen years of age or older fails to make satisfactory progress in the alternative services to which the juvenile is sentenced or if the court finds that a sentence to alternative services
would be contrary to the community interest, the court may sentence a juvenile adjudicated for an offense that would constitute a class 3, class 4, class 5, or class 6 felony or a misdemeanor weapons charge if committed by an adult
to detention for a period not to exceed forty-five days. Release for purposes of work, therapy, education, or other good cause may be granted by the court. The court may not sentence to detention a juvenile adjudicated for an offense
that would constitute a class 1 or class 2 felony if committed by an adult.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 648, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-911 (1) as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1114. Sentencing - placement based on special needs of the juvenile.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court may order that the juvenile be examined or treated by a physician, surgeon, psychiatrist, or psychologist or that the juvenile receive other special care
and may place the juvenile in a hospital or other suitable facility for such purposes; except that a juvenile may not be placed in a mental health facility operated by the department of human services until the juvenile has
received a mental health placement prescreening resulting in a recommendation that the juvenile be placed in a facility for an evaluation pursuant to section 27-65-106, or a hearing has been held by the court after notice to
all parties, including the department of human services. An order for an emergency mental health hold must not be entered unless a hearing is held and evidence indicates that the prescreening report is inadequate, incomplete,
or incorrect and that competent professional evidence is presented by a mental health professional that indicates that the juvenile has a behavioral or mental health disorder. The court shall make, prior to the hearing, orders
regarding temporary custody of the juvenile as are deemed appropriate.

Placement in any mental health facility operated by the department of human services must continue for such time as ordered by the court or until the professional person in charge of the juvenile's treatment concludes that the treatment or placement is
no longer appropriate. If placement or treatment is no longer deemed appropriate, the court must be notified and a hearing held for further disposition of the juvenile within five days excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal
holidays. The court shall make, prior to the hearing, orders regarding temporary custody of the juvenile as are deemed appropriate.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 648, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(1) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3231, § 32, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-916 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1115. Sentencing - legal custody - county department of human or social services.

Except as otherwise required by section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court, following the criteria for out-of-home placement established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404, may place legal custody of the juvenile in the county department
of human or social services.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 648, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-915 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1116. Orders - community placement - reasonable efforts required - reviews.

If the court orders legal custody of a juvenile to a county department of human or social services pursuant to this article 2.5, the order must contain specific findings as follows:

Whether placement of the juvenile out of the home would be in the juvenile's and the community's best interests;

Whether reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the juvenile from the home, whether it is reasonable that such efforts are not made because an emergency situation exists that requires the immediate removal of
the juvenile from the home, or whether such efforts are not required because of circumstances described in section 19-1-115 (7); and

Whether reasonable efforts have been made to identify kin or a suitable adult with whom to place the juvenile.

For all hearings and reviews concerning the juvenile, the court shall ensure that notice is provided to the juvenile and to the following persons with whom the juvenile is placed:

Foster parents;

Pre-adoptive parents;

Relatives; or

Kin, as defined in section 19-1-103.

Every six months after the sentencing hearing held pursuant to section 19-2.5-1102, the court shall hold a hearing to review an order of community placement or, if there is no objection by a party to the action, the court may require the department of
human services to conduct an administrative review. The entity scheduling the review shall provide notice of the review to the juvenile; the juvenile's parents or guardian; any service providers working with the juvenile;
the juvenile's guardian ad litem, if one has been appointed; and all attorneys of record to allow appearances of any of said persons at the review. At the review conducted pursuant to this subsection (3), the reviewing
entity shall determine whether:

Continued community placement is in the best interests of the juvenile and the community;

The juvenile's safety is protected in the community placement;

Reasonable efforts have been made to return the juvenile to the home or the juvenile should be permanently removed from the home;

Continued community placement is necessary and appropriate;

There has been compliance with the juvenile's case plan;

Progress has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes that necessitated the community placement; and

There is a date projected by which the juvenile will be returned and safely maintained in the home, placed for legal guardianship, or placed in a planned permanent living arrangement.

If the juvenile resides in an out-of-state placement, the entity conducting the review shall make a determination that the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the juvenile.

If the juvenile is in the legal custody of a county department of human or social services and is placed in a community placement for a period of twelve months or longer, the district court, another court of competent jurisdiction, or an administrative
body appointed or approved by the court that is not under the county department's supervision shall conduct a permanency hearing within said twelve months and every twelve months thereafter for as long as the juvenile
remains in community placement. At the permanency hearing, the entity conducting the hearing shall determine whether:

Continued community placement is in the best interests of the juvenile and the community;

The juvenile's safety is protected in the community placement;

Reasonable efforts have been made to finalize the juvenile's permanency plan that is in effect at that time;

Continued community placement is necessary and appropriate;

There has been compliance with the juvenile's case plan;

Progress has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes that necessitated the community placement;

There is a date projected by which the juvenile will be returned and safely maintained in the home, placed for legal guardianship, or placed in a planned permanent living arrangement; and

Procedural safeguards to preserve parental rights have been applied in connection with the removal of the juvenile from the home, any change in the juvenile's community placement, or any determination affecting parental visitation.

If the juvenile resides in an out-of-state placement, the entity conducting the review shall make a determination that the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the juvenile.

The entity conducting the permanency hearing shall consult with the juvenile, in an age-appropriate manner, concerning the juvenile's permanency plan.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 649, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-906.5 as it existed prior to 2021.